fi: Pajun tyyppi: Englantilainen paju; Hybridipaju; Kashmir-paju; Poppelipaju; Tape Wood; Muu
it: Tipo di salice: Salice inglese; Salice ibrido; Salice del Kashmir; Salice pioppo; Tape wood; Altro
en: Willow type: English Willow; Hybrid Willow; Kashmir Willow; Poplar Willow; Tape Wood; Other
ru: Тип ивы: Английская ива; Гибридная ива; Кашмирская ива; Тополь; Древесина для тейпбола; Другое
cs: Typ vrby: Anglická vrba; Hybridní vrba; Kašmírská vrba; Topolová vrba; Tape wood; Jiná
lt-LT: Gluosnio tipas: Angliškas gluosnis; Hibridinis gluosnis; Kašmyro gluosnis; Tuopinis gluosnis; Mediena su juosta („Tape Wood“); Kita
da: Piletype: Engelsk pil; Hybridpil; Kashmirpil; Poppel; Tape wood; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta vrbovega lesa: Angleška vrba; Hibridna vrba; Kašmirska vrba; Topol/vrba; Tape wood; Drugo
fr: Type de saule: Saule anglais; Saule hybride; Saule du Cachemire; Saule de peuplier; Tape Wood; Autre
vi: Loại liễu: Gỗ liễu Anh; Gỗ liễu lai; Gỗ liễu Kashmir; Gỗ liễu bạch dương; Gỗ cuốn băng keo; Khác
pl: Typ wierzby: Wierzba angielska; Wierzba hybrydowa; Wierzba kaszmirska; Topola; Drewno Tape Wood; Inna
nb: Type piletre: Engelsk pil; Hybridpil; Kashmir-pil; Poppelpil; Tape wood; Annet
sv: Typ av pilträ: Engelsk pil; Hybridpil; Kashmirpil; Poppel; Tape Wood; Övrigt
nl: Wilg type: Engels wilgenhout; Hybride wilgenhout; Kasjmier-wilgenhout; Populierenhout; Tape wood; Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta vrbe: Engleska vrba; Hibridna vrba; Kašmirska vrba; Topolina vrba; Drvo omotano trakom; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип върбова дървесина: Английска върба; Хибридна върба; Кашмирска върба; Тополова върба; Tape Wood; Друго
es: Tipo de sauce: Sauce inglés; Sauce híbrido; Sauce de Cachemira; Sauce álamo; Madera de cinta; Otro
sk-SK: Typ vŕby: Anglická vŕba; Hybridná vŕba; Kašmírska vŕba; Topoľ; Tape Wood; Iné
tr: Söğüt türü: İngiliz söğüdü; Hibrit söğüt; Keşmir söğüdü; Kavak söğüdü; Bant ahşap; Diğer
th: ประเภทวิลโลว์: ไม้วิลโลว์อังกฤษ; ไม้วิลโลว์ลูกผสม; ไม้วิลโลว์แคชเมียร์; ไม้วิลโลว์ป็อปลาร์; ไม้เทปวูด; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 柳木类型: 英国柳; 混合柳; 克什米尔柳; 杨柳; 胶带木; 其他
de: Art des Weidenholzes: Englische Weide; Hybrid-Weide; Kaschmir-Weide; Pappelweide; Tape Wood; Andere
ko: 버드나무 유형: 영국산 윌로우; 하이브리드 윌로우; 카슈미르 윌로우; 포플러 윌로우; 테이프 우드; 기타
hu: Fűzfa típusa: Angol fűz; Hibrid fűz; Kasmír fűz; Nyárfafűz; Tape fa; Egyéb
el: Τύπος ιτιάς: Αγγλική ιτιά; Υβριδική ιτιά; Ιτιά Κασμίρ; Poplar Willow; Tape Wood; Άλλο
pt-BR: Salgueiro tipo: Salgueiro inglês; Salgueiro híbrido; Salgueiro da Caxemira; Choupo; Tape Wood; Outro
zh-TW: 柳木類型: 英國柳木; 混合柳木; 喀什米爾柳木; 楊木; Tape Wood; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de salgueiro: Salgueiro inglês; Salgueiro híbrido; Salgueiro de Caxemira; Salgueiro choupo; Tape wood; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul salciei: Salcie englezească; Salcie hibridă; Salcie de Kashmir; Salcie de plop; Lemn Tape; Altele
ja: ヤナギタイプ: イングリッシュウィロー; ハイブリッドウィロー; カシミヤウィロー; ポプラウィロー; テープウッド; その他